Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Tenancy by the Entirety

38-31-201.
Tenancy by the entirety.

No conveyance of real property located in this state executed before or after July 1, 2006, shall create a tenancy by the entirety.

A conveyance of real property located in this state executed before July 1, 2006, that purports to create a tenancy by the entirety shall be presumed to create a joint tenancy.

A conveyance of real property located in this state executed on or after July 1, 2006, that purports to create a tenancy by the entirety shall create a joint tenancy.

History.

Source:
L. 2006:

Entire article amended, p. 242, § 1, effective July 1.